Idaho, session 2025, H0217.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-5292, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-5292. PERIODIC REVIEW SUNSET OF ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. (1) Each
rule chapter that is in effect on July 1, 2026, shall be reviewed by the leg-
islature sunset on a staggered, periodic schedule between July 1, 2026, and
June 30, 2034, and on a similar schedule each eight (8) years thereafter. The
review sunset schedule shall be established by the office of the administra-
tive rules coordinator, and the schedule shall be posted on its website and
on the cover page of each rule chapter no later than January 1, 2026.
(2) Prior to the review sunset date for each rule chapter, as estab-
lished in the review schedule pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, if
an agency intends to renew such chapter, the promulgating agency shall pre-
pare a report statement for the legislature that states the statute or fed-
eral regulation the rule is intended to implement and whether the substan-
tive content in the rule chapter is still necessary, and, if it is determined
to be necessary so, the rationale for such determination and any evidence to
justify its benefits relative to its costs. In addition, the agency shall
report state whether the necessary substantive content would be more appro-
priately integrated into Idaho Code as opposed to remaining as a separate ad-
ministrative rule. In consideration of such report statement, the promul-
gating agency shall consider:
(a) The benefit of having all related requirements in a single location
in Idaho Code;
(b) The frequency with which the substantive content of the administra-
tive rule has been updated in the prior five (5) years and the antici-
pated frequency of updates in the near future; and
(c) The cost of publishing and maintaining the administrative rule in
the Idaho administrative code and bulletin.; and
(d) The expected cost to the agency to monitor and enforce the substance
of the rule.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.